Utah statutes.
19-6-303.   Rulemaking provisions.

The executive director may regulate hazardous substances releases by making rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, consistent with the substantive requirements of CERCLA, to establish the requirements for remedial investigation studies and remedial action plans.

